Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2723
Appropriations and expenditures; exempt.

Appropriations and expenditures made by a city which are authorized by section 13-315 and made according to its provisions shall not be subject to the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act and shall be exempt from its requirements.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 3.